Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201816-306
City of the second class; reorganization as city of the first class; city council member; continuance in office.

In any city which becomes a city of the first class, any city council member whose term extends through another year or years by reason of his or her prior election under the provisions governing cities of the second class shall hold his or her office as a city council member from the ward in which he or she is a resident as if he or she were elected for the same term under the provisions of the Election Act governing cities of the first class.

Laws 1915, c. 85, § 1, p. 224;

C.S.1922, § 4040;

Laws 1923, c. 67, § 2, p. 203;

C.S.1929, § 16-302;

R.S.1943, § 16-306;

Laws 1969, c. 257, § 4, p. 934;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 24;

Laws 1990, LB 957, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 487;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 52.

Election Act, see section 32-101.

For reorganization as city of the first class, see sections 16-102 and 16-103.